North Carolina, session 2025, HB678.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Section 5 of Article III of the North Carolina Constitution is
amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(10a) Limitation. Nothing in this section, Article, or Constitution shall be construed to
empower the Governor with emergency powers beyond those expressly granted to the Governor,
as prescribed by law passed by the General Assembly. Emergency powers granted to the
Governor shall be strictly construed and may not be used to infringe on or deny the rights of the
people guaranteed in this Constitution and the Constitution of the United States. No actions by
the Governor exercising emergency powers prescribed by law may last more than two weeks
unless ratified by a joint resolution passed by a majority of the members of each house of the
General Assembly present and voting in an emergency session convened as provided under
Section 11 of Article II of this Constitution."
SECTION 1.(b) Section 11 of Article II of the North Carolina Constitution is
amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(3) Emergency sessions. Upon the declaration of a state of emergency by the Governor,
the General Assembly shall go into an emergency session beginning seven days after the effective
date of the statewide state of emergency, Sundays and State and federal holidays excepted."
SECTION 1.(c) The amendments set out in subsections (a) and (b) of this section
shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held
on November 3, 2026, which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing
elections at that time. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment to limit, under a state of emergency, both the scope of
executive action by the Governor with respect to Constitutional rights and the length executive
actions by the Governor remain valid unless ratified by the General Assembly."
Page 2 House Bill 678-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(d) The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the
referendum conducted under subsection (c) of this section. If a majority of votes cast on the
question are in favor of the amendments set out in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the
Secretary of State shall enroll the amendments among the permanent records of that office. If a
majority of votes cast on the question are against the amendments set out in subsections (a) and
(b) of this section, the amendments shall have no effect.
SECTION 1.(e) If the certification from the State Board of Elections under
subsection (d) of this section reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendments set out in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the amendments set out in
subsections (a) and (b) of this section are effective upon certification.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 166A-19.20 reads as rewritten:
"§ 166A-19.20. Gubernatorial or legislative declaration of state of emergency.
(a) Declaration. – A state of emergency may be declared by the Governor or by a
resolution of the General Assembly, if either of these finds that an emergency exists.
(b) Emergency Area. – An executive order or resolution declaring a state of emergency
shall include a definition of the area constituting the emergency area.
(c) Expiration of States of Emergency. – A state of emergency declared pursuant to this
section shall expire as follows:
(1) If not a statewide emergency area, when it is rescinded by the authority that
issued it.
(2) If a statewide emergency area, 30 seven calendar days after issuance without
a concurrence of the Council of State. A declaration of emergency may not be
continued without the concurrence of the Council of State. If the Council of
State concurs with the declaration of emergency, the declaration of emergency
shall expire 60 14 calendar days after issuance, unless the General Assembly
extends the declaration of emergency by enactment of a general law. If the
General Assembly does not extend the declaration of emergency by enactment
in accordance with this subdivision, the Governor shall not issue a
substantially similar declaration of emergency arising from the same events
that formed the basis to issue the initial declaration of emergency that was not
extended.
(c1) Effect of Failure of Concurrence of the Council of State. – If the concurrence of the
Council of State fails with the issuance or continuation of a declaration of emergency under
subdivision (c)(2) of this section, the Governor shall not issue the same or any other substantially
similar declarations of emergency based on the same emergency.
(c2) Multiple Declarations to Avoid Concurrence of Council of State. – If the Governor
declares more than one state of emergency based on the same emergency that would extend the
application of the emergency area, when combined, to more than two-thirds of the counties in
the State, the Governor shall obtain the concurrence of the Council of State in accordance with
subdivision (c)(2) of this section for each declaration of emergency.
(d) Exercise of Powers Not Contingent on Declaration of Disaster Type. – Once a state
of emergency has been declared pursuant to this section, the fact that a declaration of disaster
type has not been issued shall not preclude the exercise of powers otherwise conferred during a
state of emergency.
(e) Extra Session; Emergency Transportation Expenditures. – The General Assembly
considers a determination by the Secretary of Transportation under G.S. 136-44.2E(f) that
anticipated emergency expenses will exceed the funds in the Transportation Emergency Reserve
within the meaning of the term "extraordinary occasions," and therefore the Governor is
authorized to convene the General Assembly in Extra Session under Section 5(7) of Article III
of the North Carolina Constitution. The General Assembly strongly urges the Governor to
convene the General Assembly in Extra Session within 14 days of notice by the Secretary under
House Bill 678-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
G.S. 136-44.2E(f) for the purpose of appropriating funds from the Savings Reserve to the
Emergency Reserve to address the transportation needs of the State necessitated by a major
disaster."
SECTION 2.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to states
of emergency declared on or after that date.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 4 House Bill 678-First Edition